Connecticut, session 2026, SB00239.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 19a-127k of the general statutes is amended by
2 adding subsection (j) as follows (Effective October 1, 2026):
3 (NEW) (j) When conducting a community health needs assessment,
4 each hospital shall identify the nutrition needs of community members
5 with diabetes and congestive heart failure and, to the extent permissible
6 under federal law, (1) include such nutrition needs in the hospital's
7 community health needs assessment, and (2) include medically tailored
8 and food-based interventions for community members with diabetes or
9 congestive heart failure in the hospital's implementation strategy.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 19a-127k(j)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (j), "examine" was changed to "identify" for clarity.
PH Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 1 of 1